test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-59kerguetaemae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kergütämä: # Verb (59) kergütämä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kergütämä+V+Inf/mA: kergütämä
     kergütämä+V+Inf: kergütäq
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrfPrc: kergütänüq
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [kergütet, kergütedü]
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kergüdä
##
#kaotama => kergütämä
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kergütät, kergütädeq]
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kergütäs
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kergütämiq
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kergütätiq
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kergütäseq
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg: [kergüdä-äiq, kergüdä-äi, kergüdä-iq, kergüdä-i]
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: kergüdäq
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: kergüdä
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kergüdi
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kergütit, kergüdiq, kergütideq]
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kergüt́
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kergütimiq
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kergütitiq
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kergüdiq, kergütiväq]
     kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg: [kergüdä-äs, kergüdä-s]


     kergütämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kergütäv

     kergütämä+V+Jus: kergütäguq

     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kergütedä
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kergütedät, kergütedädeq]
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kergütedäs
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kergütedämiq
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kergütedätiq
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kergütedäseq
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Neg: [kergütedä-äiq, kergütedä-äi, kergütedä-iq, kergütedä-i]
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegI: kergütedäq
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: kergütedä

     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kergütedi
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kergütedit, kergütediq, kergütedideq]
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kergütedi
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kergütedimiq
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kergüteditiq
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kergütediq, kergütediväq]
     kergütämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Neg: [kergütedä-äs, kergütedä-s]

     kergütämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kergütäv
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: kergütävä
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: kergütävät
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: kergütävähe
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kergütäväq
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [kergütävide, kergütäviide]
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [kergütävit, kergütäviid]
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [kergütävihe, kergütäviihe]

     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kergütedäv
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: kergütedävä
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: kergütedävät
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: kergütedävähe
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kergütedäväq
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [kergütedävide, kergütedäviide]
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [kergütedävit, kergütedäviid]
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [kergütedävihe, kergütedäviihe]

     kergütämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kergütänüq
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: kergütänü
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: kergütänüt
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: kergütänühe
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kergütänüq
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [kergütänüide, kergütänüisi]
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [kergütänüid, kergütänüisi]
     kergütämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [kergütänüihe, kergütänüisihe]

     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [kergütet, kergütedü]
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: kergütedü
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: kergütedüt
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: kergütedühe
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kergütedüq
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [kergütedüide, kergütedüisi]
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [kergütedüid, kergütedüisi]
     kergütämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [kergütedüihe, kergütedüisihe]
